Connecticut, session 2026, HB05147.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 10-285a of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (a) (1) The percentage of school building project grant money a local
5 board of education may be eligible to receive, under the provisions of
6 section 10-286, as amended by this act, shall be assigned by the
7 Commissioner of Administrative Services in accordance with the
8 percentage calculated by the Commissioner of Education as follows: (A)
9 For grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which application is
10 made on and after July 1, 1991, and before July 1, 2011, (i) each town
11 shall be ranked in descending order from one to one hundred sixty-nine
12 according to such town's adjusted equalized net grand list per capita, as
13 defined in section 10-261; and (ii) based upon such ranking, a percentage
14 of not less than twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for
15 each town on a continuous scale; (B) for grants approved pursuant to
16 section 10-283 for which application is made on and after July 1, 2011,
17 and before July 1, 2017, (i) each town shall be ranked in descending
18 order from one to one hundred sixty-nine according to such town's
LCO 1 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
19 adjusted equalized net grand list per capita, as defined in section 10-261,
20 and (ii) based upon such ranking, (I) a percentage of not less than ten
21 nor more than seventy shall be determined for new construction or
22 replacement of a school building for each town on a continuous scale,
23 and (II) a percentage of not less than twenty nor more than eighty shall
24 be determined for renovations, extensions, code violations, roof
25 replacements and major alterations of an existing school building and
26 the new construction or replacement of a school building when a town
27 or regional school district can demonstrate that a new construction or
28 replacement is less expensive than a renovation, extension or major
29 alteration of an existing school building for each town on a continuous
30 scale; (C) for grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which
31 application is made on and after July 1, 2017, and before June 1, 2022, (i)
32 each town shall be ranked in descending order from one to one hundred
33 sixty-nine according to the adjusted equalized net grand list per capita,
34 as defined in section 10-261, of the town two, three and four years prior
35 to the fiscal year in which application is made, (ii) based upon such
36 ranking, (I) a percentage of not less than ten nor more than seventy shall
37 be determined for new construction or replacement of a school building
38 for each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a percentage of not less
39 than twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for renovations,
40 extensions, code violations, roof replacements and major alterations of
41 an existing school building and the new construction or replacement of
42 a school building when a town or regional school district can
43 demonstrate that a new construction or replacement is less expensive
44 than a renovation, extension or major alteration of an existing school
45 building for each town on a continuous scale; (D) except as otherwise
46 provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, for grants approved
47 pursuant to section 10-283 for which application is made on and after
48 June 1, 2022, (i) each town shall be ranked in descending order from one
49 to one hundred sixty-nine according to the adjusted equalized net grand
50 list per capita, as defined in section 10-261, of the town two, three and
51 four years prior to the fiscal year in which application is made, and (ii)
52 based upon such ranking, (I) a percentage of not less than ten nor more
53 than seventy shall be determined for new construction or replacement
LCO 2 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
54 of a school building for each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a
55 percentage of not less than twenty nor more than eighty shall be
56 determined for renovations, extensions, code violations, roof
57 replacements and major alterations of an existing school building and
58 the new construction or replacement of a school building when a town
59 or regional school district can demonstrate that a new construction or
60 replacement is less expensive than a renovation, extension or major
61 alteration of an existing school building for each town on a continuous
62 scale; and (E) except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this
63 subsection, for grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which
64 application is made on and after July 1, 2024, (i) each town shall be
65 ranked in descending order from one to one hundred sixty-nine
66 according to the adjusted equalized net grand list per capita, as defined
67 in section 10-261, of the town two, three and four years prior to the fiscal
68 year in which application is made, and (ii) based upon such ranking, (I)
69 a percentage of not less than ten nor more than eighty shall be
70 determined for new construction or replacement of a school building for
71 each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a percentage of not less than
72 twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for renovations,
73 extensions, code violations, roof replacements and major alterations of
74 an existing school building and the new construction or replacement of
75 a school building when a town or regional school district can
76 demonstrate that a new construction or replacement is less expensive
77 than a renovation, extension or major alteration of an existing school
78 building for each town on a continuous scale.
79 (2) For grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which
80 application is made prior to July 1, 2047, the percentage of school
81 building project grant money a local board of education for (A) any
82 town with a total population of eighty thousand or greater may be
83 eligible to receive shall be the greater of the percentage calculated
84 pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection or sixty per cent, and (B)
85 the town of Cheshire shall be the greater of the percentage calculated
86 pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection or fifty per cent.
87 (b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this
LCO 3 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
88 subsection, the percentage of school building project grant money a
89 regional board of education may be eligible to receive under the
90 provisions of section 10-286, as amended by this act, shall be determined
91 by its ranking. Such ranking shall be determined by (A) multiplying the
92 total population, as defined in section 10-261, of each town in the district
93 by such town's ranking, as determined in subsection (a) of this section,
94 (B) adding together the figures determined under subparagraph (A) of
95 this subdivision, and (C) dividing the total computed under
96 subparagraph (B) of this subdivision by the total population of all towns
97 in the district. The ranking of each regional board of education shall be
98 rounded to the next higher whole number and each such board shall
99 receive the same reimbursement percentage as would a town with the
100 same rank plus ten per cent, except that no such percentage shall exceed
101 eighty-five per cent.
102 (2) Any board of education of a regional school district established or
103 expanded on or after July 1, 2016, that submits an application for a
104 school building project (A) not later than ten years after the
105 establishment or expansion of such regional school district, and (B) that
106 is related to such establishment or expansion, may be eligible to receive
107 a percentage of school building project grant money, under the
108 provisions of section 10-286, as amended by this act, as follows: The
109 reimbursement percentage of the town in such regional school district
110 with the greatest reimbursement percentage, as determined in
111 subsection (a) of this section, plus ten per cent.
112 (c) The percentage of school building project grant money a regional
113 educational service center may be eligible to receive shall be determined
114 by its ranking. Such ranking shall be determined by (1) multiplying the
115 population of each member town in the regional educational service
116 center by such town's ranking, as determined in subsection (a) of this
117 section; (2) adding together the figures for each town determined under
118 subdivision (1) of this subsection, and (3) dividing the total computed
119 under subdivision (2) of this subsection by the total population of all
120 member towns in the regional educational service center. The ranking
121 of each regional educational service center shall be rounded to the next
LCO 4 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
122 higher whole number and each such center shall receive the same
123 reimbursement percentage as would a town with the same rank.
124 (d) The percentage of school building project grant money a
125 cooperative arrangement pursuant to section 10-158a, may be eligible to
126 receive shall be determined by its ranking. Such ranking shall be
127 determined by (1) multiplying the total population, as defined in section
128 10-261, of each town in the cooperative arrangement by such town's
129 ranking, as determined in subsection (a) of this section, (2) adding the
130 products determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, and (3)
131 dividing the total computed under subdivision (2) of this subsection by
132 the total population of all towns in the cooperative arrangement. The
133 ranking of each cooperative arrangement shall be rounded to the next
134 higher whole number and each such cooperative arrangement shall
135 receive the same reimbursement percentage as would a town with the
136 same rank plus ten percentage points.
137 (e) (1) If an elementary school building project for a new building or
138 for the expansion of an existing building includes space for an early
139 childhood care and education program that provides services for
140 children from birth to five years, the percentage determined pursuant to
141 this section for the entire school building project shall be increased by
142 fifteen percentage points, but shall not exceed one hundred per cent.
143 Recipient districts shall maintain such early childhood care and
144 education program for at least ten years.
145 (2) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for any school
146 building project for a building or facility that will be used exclusively by
147 a local or regional board of education for an early childhood care and
148 education program that provides services for children from birth to five
149 years shall be increased by fifteen percentage points, but shall not
150 exceed one hundred per cent. Recipient districts shall maintain such
151 early childhood care and education program for at least twenty years.
152 (f) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school
153 building project grant for the expansion, alteration or renovation of an
LCO 5 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
154 existing public school building to convert such building for use as a
155 lighthouse school, as defined in section 10-266cc, shall be increased by
156 ten percentage points.
157 (g) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school
158 building project grant shall be increased by the percentage of the total
159 projected enrollment of the school attributable to the number of spaces
160 made available for out-of-district students participating in the program
161 established pursuant to section 10-266aa, provided the maximum
162 increase shall not exceed ten percentage points.
163 (h) Subject to the provisions of section 10-285d, if an elementary
164 school building project for a school in a priority school district or for a
165 priority school is necessary in order to offer a full-day kindergarten
166 program or a full-day preschool program or to reduce class size
167 pursuant to section 10-265f, the percentage determined pursuant to this
168 section shall be increased by fifteen percentage points, but shall not
169 exceed one hundred per cent, for the portion of the building used
170 primarily for such full-day kindergarten program, full-day preschool
171 program or such reduced size classes. Recipient districts that receive an
172 increase pursuant to this subsection in support of a full-day preschool
173 program shall maintain full-day preschool enrollment for at least ten
174 years.
175 (i) For all projects authorized on or after July 1, 2007, all attorneys'
176 fees and court costs related to litigation shall be eligible for state school
177 construction grant assistance only if the grant applicant is the prevailing
178 party in any such litigation.
179 (j) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school
180 building project grant for a diversity school, approved pursuant to
181 section 10-286h, shall be increased by ten percentage points.
182 (k) If a school building project for a new building or for the
183 renovation or expansion of an existing building includes plans for the
184 expansion or creation of in-district special education programming and
185 services, the percentage determined pursuant to this section shall be
LCO 6 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
186 increased by fifteen percentage points, but shall not exceed one hundred
187 per cent, for the portion of the project used primarily for such purpose,
188 provided the portion of such school building project that will be used
189 primarily for such in-district special education programming and
190 services shall be a part of a school building that is being used to provide
191 a program of general education for nonspecial education students and
192 is a part of the school building being constructed or renovated or
193 expanded; and, provided further, any additional funding received by
194 the local or regional board of education resulting from and related to the
195 inclusion of such plans for the expansion or creation of in-district special
196 education programming and services shall be expended for such
197 construction or renovation or expansion.
198 (l) On and after July 1, 2026, for applications submitted pursuant to
199 subsection (a) of section 10-283, the reimbursement percentage of school
200 building project that a local or regional board of education or an
201 endowed academy approved pursuant to section 10-34 shall be
202 increased by five percentage points, provided such increase shall not
203 result in a reimbursement percentage exceeding one hundred per cent,
204 if the municipality (1) is in compliance with the provisions of section 8-
205 13bb regarding its housing growth plan or compliance with a regional
206 housing growth plan, as applicable, and has demonstrated steps such
207 municipality has taken to implement its housing growth policies, (2) is
208 a qualifying transit-oriented community pursuant to section 8-13hh, or
209 (3) has adopted a development district established pursuant to a
210 memorandum of agreement with the Connecticut Municipal
211 Development Authority.
212 (m) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
213 percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school building
214 project grant shall not exceed one hundred per cent.
215 Sec. 2. Section 10-292q of the general statutes is repealed and the
216 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
217 (a) There is established a [School Building Projects Advisory Council]
LCO 7 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
218 School Safety and Security Infrastructure Advisory Council. The council
219 shall consist of: (1) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and
220 Management, or the secretary's designee, (2) the Commissioner of
221 Administrative Services, or the commissioner's designee, (3) the
222 Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee, (4) the
223 Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, or the
224 commissioner's designee, (5) the [chairperson of the Technical
225 Education and Career System board, or the chairperson's] executive
226 director of the Technical Education and Career System, or the executive
227 director's designee, and (6) [six] eight members appointed by the
228 Governor, one of whom shall be a person with experience in school
229 [building] safety and security infrastructure project matters, one of
230 whom shall be a person with experience in [architecture] school safety
231 and security planning, one of whom shall be a person with experience
232 in [engineering] school physical infrastructure hardening, one of whom
233 shall be a person from higher education with experience in [school]
234 campus safety, one of whom shall be a [person with experience with the
235 administration of the State Building Code,] representative of a rural
236 school district, one of whom shall be a representative of a suburban
237 school district, one of whom shall be a representative of an urban school
238 district and one of whom shall be a person with experience and expertise
239 in construction for students with disabilities and the accessibility
240 provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 USC 12101 et seq.
241 The terms for those members appointed under subdivision (6) of this
242 subsection before the effective date of this section shall expire on June
243 30, 2026, and the members appointed under said subdivision shall be
244 appointed not later than September 1, 2026.
245 (b) (1) Prior to the effective date of this section, (A) the chairperson of
246 the council shall be the Commissioner of Administrative Services, or the
247 commissioner's designee; [. A] and (B) a person employed by the
248 Department of Administrative Services who is responsible for school
249 building projects shall serve as the administrative staff of the council.
250 (2) On and after the effective date of this section, (A) the chairperson
251 of the council shall be the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
LCO 8 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
252 Public Protection, or the commissioner's designee; and (B) a person
253 employed by the Department of Emergency Services and Public
254 Protection shall serve as the administrative staff of the council.
255 (3) The council shall meet at least quarterly to discuss matters relating
256 to school [building] safety and security infrastructure projects.
257 [(b)] (c) The [School Building Projects Advisory Council] council shall
258 (1) develop [model blueprints for new school building]
259 recommendations regarding school safety and security infrastructure
260 projects that are in accordance with industry standards for school
261 [buildings and the school safety infrastructure criteria, developed
262 pursuant to section 10-292r] safety and security infrastructure, (2)
263 conduct studies, research and analyses related to school safety and
264 security infrastructure, (3) make recommendations for improvements to
265 the school [building projects] safety and security grant processes,
266 including eligibility criteria, to the Governor and the joint standing
267 [committee] committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
268 matters relating to [appropriations and the budgets of state agencies,]
269 education and [finance, revenue and bonding] public safety, and (4)
270 periodically review and update, as necessary, the school safety
271 infrastructure criteria developed pursuant to section 10-292r, as
272 amended by this act.
273 Sec. 3. Section 10-292r of the general statutes is repealed and the
274 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
275 (a) The [School Building Projects Advisory Council] School Safety
276 and Security Infrastructure Advisory Council, established pursuant to
277 section 10-292q, as amended by this act, shall periodically review and
278 update, as necessary, school safety infrastructure criteria for school
279 building projects awarded grants pursuant to this chapter and the
280 school security infrastructure competitive grant program, pursuant to
281 section 84 of public act 13-3. Such school safety infrastructure criteria
282 shall conform to industry standards for school building safety
283 infrastructure and shall address areas including, but not be limited to,
LCO 9 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
284 (1) entryways to school buildings and classrooms, such as,
285 reinforcement of entryways, ballistic glass, solid core doors, double
286 door access, computer-controlled electronic locks, remote locks on all
287 entrance and exits and buzzer systems, (2) the use of cameras
288 throughout the school building and at all entrances and exits, including
289 the use of closed-circuit television monitoring, (3) penetration resistant
290 vestibules, and (4) other security infrastructure improvements and
291 devices as they become industry standards. The council shall meet at
292 least annually to review and update, if necessary, the school safety
293 infrastructure criteria and make such criteria available to local and
294 regional boards of education.
295 (b) The [School Building Projects Advisory Council] council shall
296 submit any updates made to the school safety infrastructure criteria to
297 the Commissioners of Emergency Services and Public Protection and
298 Education and the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
299 having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and education, in
300 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
301 Sec. 4. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 10-264h of the 2026
302 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
303 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
304 (b) Subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the
305 applicant shall receive current payments of scheduled estimated eligible
306 [project] costs for the interdistrict magnet school facility, provided (1)
307 the applicant files an application for a school building project, in
308 accordance with section 10-283, by the date prescribed by the
309 Commissioner of Administrative Services, (2) final plans and
310 specifications for the project are approved pursuant to sections 10-291
311 and 10-292, and (3) such applicant submits to the Commissioner of
312 Education, in such form as the commissioner prescribes, and the
313 commissioner approves a plan for the operation of the facility which
314 includes, but need not be limited to: A description of the educational
315 programs to be offered, the completion date for the project, an estimated
316 budget for the operation of the facility, written commitments for
LCO 10 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
317 participation from the districts that will participate in the school and an
318 analysis of the effect of the program on the reduction of racial, ethnic
319 and economic isolation. The Commissioner of Education shall notify the
320 Commissioner of Administrative Services and the secretary of the State
321 Bond Commission when the provisions of subdivision (3) of this
322 subsection have been met. Upon application to the Commissioner of
323 Administrative Services, compliance with the provisions of subdivision
324 (3) of this subsection and after authorization by the General Assembly
325 pursuant to section 10-283, the applicant shall be eligible to receive
326 progress payments in accordance with the provisions of section 10-287i,
327 as amended by this act.
328 (c) (1) If the school building ceases to be used as an interdistrict
329 magnet school facility and the grant was provided for the purchase or
330 construction of the facility, the Commissioner of Administrative
331 Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Education, shall
332 determine whether (A) title to the building and any legal interest in
333 appurtenant land shall revert to the state, or (B) the school district shall
334 reimburse the state an amount equal to the difference between the
335 amount received pursuant to this section and the amount the district
336 would have been eligible to receive based on the percentage determined
337 pursuant to section 10-285a, as amended by this act, multiplied by the
338 estimated eligible [project] costs.
339 (2) If the school building ceases to be used as an interdistrict magnet
340 school facility and the grant was provided for the extension or major
341 alteration of the facility, the school district shall reimburse the state the
342 amount determined in accordance with subparagraph (B) of subdivision
343 (1) of this subsection. A school district receiving a request for
344 reimbursement pursuant to this subdivision shall reimburse the state
345 not later than the close of the fiscal year following the year in which the
346 request is made. If the school district fails to so reimburse the state, the
347 Department of Administrative Services may request the Department of
348 Education to withhold such amount from the total sum which is paid
349 from the State Treasury to such school district or the town in which it is
350 located or, in the case of a regional school district, the towns which
LCO 11 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
351 comprise the school district. If the amount paid from the State Treasury
352 is less than the amount due, the Department of Administrative Services
353 shall collect such amount from the school district.
354 Sec. 5. Subdivision (12) of section 10-282 of the general statutes is
355 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
356 passage):
357 (12) "Net eligible costs" means eligible [project] costs adjusted for the
358 state standard education space specifications;
359 Sec. 6. Subdivisions (5) and (6) of subsection (a) of section 10-286 of
360 the general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
361 thereof (Effective from passage):
362 (5) In the case of a public school administrative or service facility, one-
363 half of the eligible percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
364 subsection of the eligible [project] cost as determined by the
365 Commissioner of Administrative Services, or in the case of a regional
366 educational service center administrative or service facility, the eligible
367 percentage, as determined pursuant to subsection (c) of section 10-285a,
368 as amended by this act, of the eligible [project] cost as determined by the
369 commissioner;
370 (6) In the case of the total replacement of a roof or the total
371 replacement of a portion of a roof which has existed for at least twenty
372 years, or in the case of the total replacement of a roof or the total
373 replacement of a portion of a roof which has existed for fewer than
374 twenty years when it is determined by a registered architect or
375 registered engineer that such roof was improperly designed or
376 improperly constructed and the town is prohibited from recovery of
377 damages or has no other recourse at law or in equity, the eligible
378 percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, of the eligible
379 cost as determined by the Commissioner of Administrative Services. In
380 the case of the total replacement of a roof or the total replacement of a
381 portion of a roof which has existed for fewer than twenty years (A) when
382 it is determined by a registered architect or registered engineer that such
LCO 12 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
383 roof was improperly designed or improperly constructed and the town
384 has recourse at law or in equity and recovers less than such eligible cost,
385 the eligible percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection of
386 the difference between such recovery and such eligible cost, and (B)
387 when the roof is at least fifteen years old but less than twenty years old
388 and it cannot be determined by a registered architect or registered
389 engineer that such roof was improperly designed or improperly
390 constructed, the eligible percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
391 subsection of the eligible [project] costs provided such costs are
392 multiplied by the ratio of the age of the roof to twenty years. For
393 purposes of this subparagraph, the age of the roof shall be determined
394 in whole years to the nearest year based on the time between the
395 completed installation of the old roof and the date of the grant
396 application for the school construction project for the new roof;
397 Sec. 7. Section 10-287i of the general statutes is repealed and the
398 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
399 A grant under this chapter for any school building project authorized
400 by the General Assembly on or after July 1, 1996, or for any project for
401 which application is made pursuant to subsection (b) of section 10-283,
402 on or after July 1, 1997, shall be paid as follows: Applicants shall request
403 progress payments for the state share of eligible [project] costs
404 calculated pursuant to sections 10-65, 10-76e and 10-286, as amended by
405 this act, at such time and in such manner as the Commissioner of
406 Administrative Services shall prescribe provided no payments shall
407 commence until the applicant has filed a notice of authorization of
408 funding for the local share of project costs, and provided further no
409 payments other than those for architectural planning and site
410 acquisition shall be made prior to approval of the final architectural
411 plans pursuant to section 10-292. For any project authorized on or after
412 July 1, 2024, the Department of Administrative Services shall withhold
413 five per cent of a grant if the commissioner determines that the applicant
414 has failed to comply with the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection
415 (b) of section 4a-60g relating to minority business enterprises. The
416 Department of Administrative Services shall withhold five per cent of a
LCO 13 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5147
417 grant pending completion of an audit pursuant to section 10-287
418 provided, if the department is unable to complete the required audit
419 within six months of the date a request for final payment is filed, the
420 applicant may have an independent audit performed and include the
421 cost of such audit in the eligible [project] costs.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-285a
Sec. 2 from passage 10-292q
Sec. 3 from passage 10-292r
Sec. 4 from passage 10-264h(b) and (c)
Sec. 5 from passage 10-282(12)
Sec. 6 from passage 10-286(a)(5) and (6)
Sec. 7 from passage 10-287i
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 14 of 14